Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 2, chapter 659, Oregon Laws 2021, as amended by section  2, chapter 23,
Oregon Laws 2023, and section 2, chapter 105, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the  following amounts are estab-
lished for a six-year period beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits  for payment of expenses
from federal funds collected or received by the state agencies listed, for the  acquisition of land and
the acquisition, planning, constructing, altering, repairing, furnishing and equipping of buildings  and
facilities:
(1) Oregon Department of
Aviation, Siletz Bay State
Airport Runway and
Electrical Rehabilitation ................. $ 3,069,187
(2) Oregon Military Department:
(a) Camp Umatilla Barracks
Facilities ..............................................$ 57,743,000
(b) Camp Umatilla Guard Shack .......... $ 1,100,000
(c) Washington County
[Readiness Center .............................. $ 26,000,000]
Readiness Center ...................... $ 28,500,000
SECTION 2.
 Section 4, chapter 659, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  [ $56,496,994]
$58,996,994 is established for a six-year period beginning  July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds,  collected or received by the Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission, for expenditures  of proceeds from state bonds issued for the benefit of a com-
munity college, pursuant to agreements between the commission and a community college.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 5051 (HB 5051-A) Page 1
Passed by House March 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 7, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5051 (HB 5051-A) Page 2